Virginia statutes. Title 62.1. Waters of the State, Ports and Harbors.
Article 8. Discharge of Oil Into Waters.

§§ 62.1-44.34:1 through 62.1-44.34:6.
Repealed by Acts 1990, c. 917.

Cross references.

As to present provisions relating to discharge of oil into waters, see §§

62.1-44.34:14

through

62.1-44.34:23

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1990, c. 962 purported to amend §§ 62.1-44.34:2, 62.1-44.34:3 and 62.1-44.34:4, which were repealed by Acts 1990, c. 917. The effect of these amendments was to add lands and storm drain systems in the Commonwealth, along with state waters, as places where the discharging of oil is prohibited. At the direction of the Code Commission, these amendments have been effectuated in corresponding new code sections, §§

62.1-44.34:18

and

62.1-44.34:19

.

§ 62.1-44.34:7.
Repealed by Acts 1989, c. 627.

Cross references.

As to the Virginia Petroleum Storage Tank Fund, see Article 10 of this chapter, §

62.1-44.34:10

et seq.

Editor’s note.

Acts 1989, c. 627, cl. 3 provides that all moneys in the Virginia Oil Spill Contingency Fund as of July 1, 1989, are transferred to the Virginia Underground Petroleum Storage Tank Fund.

The repealed section was amended by Acts 1989, c. 608.